Massachusetts, session 194th, S283.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of section 165 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clause (3) and inserting
in place thereof the following clause:-
(3) demonstrates to the board, the successful completion of a masters degree in a relevant
field from an educational institution licensed by the state in which it is located and meets
national standards for granting of a masters degree with a subspecialization in marriage and
family therapy, rehabilitation counseling, counseling, or a relevant subspecialization approved by
the board; provided, however, that all relevant graduate coursework credits, as determined by the
board, that an individual earns that count towards the credit requirement for professional
of 3

licensure as specialized instructional support personnel, which is inclusive of school counselors,
school social workers, adjustment counselors, and school psychologists, by the department of
elementary and secondary education shall be applied towards this educational requirement for
applicants seeking licensure as a mental health counselor, including credits earned in a graduate
program that is less than 60 credits. To be eligible for licensure, an applicant must have 2
additional years of supervised clinical experience in the relevant field in: (i) either a clinic or
hospital licensed by the department of mental health or accredited by the Joint Commission on
Accreditation of Hospitals or in an equivalent center or institute; (ii) in a school setting as a
specialized instructional support personnel licensed by the department of elementary and
secondary education; or (iii) under the direction of a supervisor approved by the board. For
purposes of this clause, “Supervision” shall be defined as no less than 200 hours of supervised
clinical experience, including experience as a specialized instructional support personnel
licensed by the department of elementary and secondary education, at least 100 hours of which
shall consist of individual supervision with a clinician who has expertise in marriage and family
therapy, rehabilitation counseling, school counseling, educational psychology, social work, or
counseling and who holds a masters degree in social work, marriage and family therapy,
rehabilitation counseling, educational psychology, counseling or an equivalent field or holds a
doctorate degree in psychology, or a medical degree with a subspecialization in psychiatry;
provided, however, that experience as specialized instructional support personnel shall only
apply towards the supervised experience requirement for applicants who are seeking licensure as
a mental health counselor;
SECTION 2. Said section 165 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “section”, in line 30, the following words:- provided,
of 3

however, that a school counselor shall be qualified to sit for the written or oral examination for
licensure as a mental health counselor.
of 3